Maryland, session 2026, SB0453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
11–522.
(a) In this section, “Arabian breed horse” means a horse that:
(1) is a purebred Arabian breed horse; and
(2) has a valid certificate of registry with the Arabian Jockey Club of
America.
(b) A licensee at Pimlico Race Course OR LAUREL PARK may conduct live racing
of Arabian breed horses if:
(1) no more than one Arabian breed race is conducted per day;
(2) no more than three Arabian breed races are conducted during a race
meet;
(3) an Arabian breed race is conducted in addition to, and not in place of,
an existing thoroughbred race;
(4) an Arabian breed race does not reduce the number of thoroughbred
races conducted by the licensee per racing day;
(5) the purse for an Arabian breed race is:
– 1 –

Ch. 317 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) not funded by the thoroughbred purse account; and
(ii) funded by the licensee or the sponsor of the Arabian horse race;
(6) the takeout provisions of §§ 11–514 and 11–515 of this subtitle are
applied to the race;
(7) the licensee pays all taxes and fees associated with the Arabian breed
race that would otherwise be due on a thoroughbred race; and
(8) the Arabian breed race is approved by the State Racing Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –